North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-01.2 County Social Service Boards

50-01.2-00.1.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Host county” means the county within the human service zone in which the human service zone administrative office is located and in which the human service zone team members are employed.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 1; 1999, ch. 421, § 1; 2001, ch. 418, § 1; 2007, ch. 417, § 4; 2013, ch. 367, § 2; 2015, ch. 329, § 2, effective January 1, 2016; 2019, ch. 391, § 71, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 329, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 367, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-01.2-00.1.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Host county” means the county within the human service zone in which the human service zone administrative office is located and in which the human service zone team members are employed.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 1; 1999, ch. 421, § 1; 2001, ch. 418, § 1; 2007, ch. 417, § 4; 2013, ch. 367, § 2; 2015, ch. 329, § 2, effective January 1, 2016; 2019, ch. 391, § 71, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 380, effective September 1, 2022.

50-01.2-01.
Human service zone board — Members — Qualifications.

The board of county commissioners of each county within the human service zone shall appoint the appointed members of the human service zone board based upon fitness to serve as members by reason of character, experience, and training without regard to political affiliation. Appointed members of the human service zone board must consist of local elected officials and other key community partners. If a human service zone consists of two or more counties, each county must be represented on the human service zone board by only one county commissioner of that county. If a human service zone consists of a single county, the county must be represented on the human service zone board by no more than two county commissioners of that county and the human service zone board must have at least five appointed members. Appointed members shall elect a vice presiding officer and appoint a secretary, and other officers as the human service zone board determines necessary. The human service zone director shall serve as presiding officer of the human service zone board as a nonappointed member.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 18; 2019, ch. 391, § 72, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 353, § 12, effective January 1, 2022.

50-01.2-02.
Members of human service zone board — Term of office — Oath — Compensation.

The appointed members of the human service zone board serve a term of three years or until their successors have duly qualified. The members appointed to the initial human service zone board of a human service zone, however, must be appointed to staggered terms determined according to the plan approved pursuant to section 50-01.1-03. Each appointed member of the human service zone board shall qualify by taking the oath provided for civil officers. The oath must be filed with the county auditor of the county of residency. The human service zone shall compensate appointed members of the human service zone board at a rate established by the host county commission, upon consultation with the other county commissions in the human service zone, consistent with the rate of compensation for members of other appointed boards within the member counties and not to exceed the compensation and expense reimbursement of members of the legislative assembly. The human service zone shall also pay members for mileage and actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and in other performance of official duties of the members in the amounts provided by law for other state officers.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 18; 2013, ch. 93, § 15; 2019, ch. 391, § 73, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 15 of chapter 93, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-01.2-03.
Duties of human service zone board.

The human service zone board in this state shall:

Provide information to the department relative to the community needs of the human service zone residents and advocate to meet those needs.

Review services and programs provided by the human service zone and make periodic recommendations for improvement in services, programs, or facilities.

Aid and assist in every reasonable way to efficiently coordinate and conduct human service activities within the human service zone by private as well as public organizations.

Establish procedures for the review and approval of all claims against the human service zone human services fund.

Supervise and take other personnel actions related to the human service zone director with direct consultation and involvement from the department. Hire the human service zone director with the express approval of the department. Employment must be consistent with the provisions of any law, rule, order, or regulation of the United States or any federal agency or authority requiring civil service or merit standards or classifications as a condition for providing funds administered by the department. A human service zone director must be hired by April 1, 2020.

Hear and act on employee grievances in accordance with the human service zone plan and in compliance with merit system requirements.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 18; 2005, ch. 418, § 1; 2013, ch. 367, § 3; 2017, ch. 331, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 74, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 367, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

50-01.2-03.1.
Board may contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 3; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 139, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01.2-03.2.
County duties. [Expired]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 4; 1999, ch. 34, § 9; 2001, ch. 12, § 26; 2001, ch. 15, § 25; 2005, ch. 416, § 1; 2009, ch. 410, § 1; 2011, ch. 350, § 1; 2017, ch. 341, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; expired by 2019, ch. 391, § 75, effective July 1, 2019.

50-01.2-04.
Removal of members of the human service zone board.

The appointing board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution to remove an appointed member of the human service zone board without cause. The board of county commissioners may not remove the human service zone director as presiding officer of the human service zone board.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 18; 2019, ch. 391, § 76, effective January 1, 2020.

50-01.2-05.
Actions and proceedings — Duty of state’s attorney.

Any suit or other proceeding arising out of the administration of the laws pertaining to the support of persons eligible for county general assistance or general assistance must be brought by or against the county in its corporate name, human service zone, or department. The state’s attorney shall institute and conduct or defend any and all actions or proceedings that may be instituted under chapter 50-01. The department may institute and conduct or defend any and all actions or proceedings that may be instituted under section 50-01-21.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 456, § 18; 2019, ch. 391, § 77, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 353, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

50-01.2-06.
Standards of administration — Action upon failure to administer — Peer review committee — Appeal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 2; 1997, ch. 432, § 22; 2001, ch. 293, § 25; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 139, effective January 1, 2020.